Wisconsin, session 2025, SB620.
do enact as follows:SB620,14Section 1. 301.45 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB620,2,95301.45 (4) (b) If the person is on parole or extended supervision and the 6person knows that any of the information under sub. (2) (a) 5. will be changing, the 1person shall provide the department with the updated information before the 2change in his or her address occurs. If the person is on parole or extended 3supervision and any of the information under sub. (2) (a) 5. changes but the person 4did not know before the change occurred that his or her address would be changing, 5the person shall provide the department with the updated information within 24 6hours after the change in his or her address occurs. If the person is on parole or 7extended supervision and is unable to provide an address, the person shall notify 8the department within 24 hours after the person becomes no longer able to provide 9an address.SB620,210Section 2. 301.48 (2) (e) of the statutes is created to read:SB620,2,1411301.48 (2) (e) If a person who is subject to the reporting requirements under 12s. 301.45 but who is not subject to tracking under this section is unable to provide 13an address as required under s. 301.45 (2) (a) 5., the department shall have the 14person tracked using passive positioning system tracking.SB620,2,1515